Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-924
Act; applicability.

Nothing contained in the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act and sections 16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610 shall be deemed to repeal or restrict any provision of law authorizing any political subdivision to consider, ascertain, adjust, compromise, settle, determine, allow, or pay any claim other than a tort claim as defined in such act and sections.

Laws 1969, c. 138, § 18, p. 634;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2418;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1032.